Arkansas, session 2025, HB1700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1111(c)(3)(A), concerning the
information required from a utilization review entity in an adverse
determination notice under the Prior Authorization Transparency Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(3)(A)(i) Subject to this subdivision (c)(3), when an adverse
determination is issued by a utilization review entity that questions the
medical necessity, the appropriateness, or the experimental or
investigational nature of a healthcare service, the utilization review entity
shall provide in the notice of adverse determination the name and telephone
number of a physician who possesses a current and unrestricted license in
this state with whom the requesting healthcare provider may have a reasonable
opportunity to discuss the patient's treatment plan and the clinical basis
for the intervention.
*ANS111*
04-02-2025 11:44:39 ANS111

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 HB1700

(ii) A physician contacted by a
requesting healthcare provider under subdivision (c)(3)(A)(i) of this section
shall disclose his or her name and license information to the requesting
healthcare provider.
(iii) If a healthcare provider submits an audio
recording demonstrating a violation of subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section
to the State Insurance Department:
(a) The requested prior authorization is
deemed approved; and
(b) The department shall direct the
utilization review entity to immediately issue the requested prior
authorization to the healthcare provider.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1115(b), concerning the information
required in the written and verbal notice of an adverse determination under
the Prior Authorization Transparency Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The written or verbal notice required to a healthcare provider
under this section shall include:
(1) The following information:
(A) The name, title, and telephone number of the physician
responsible for making the adverse determination and, in the event that the
physician responsible for making the adverse determination is not available,
a telephone number where a peer-to-peer contact with another physician
regarding the adverse determination can be made;
(B) The reviewing physician's specialty or practice area,
including board certification status or board eligibility; and
(C) A list of states in which the reviewing physician is
licensed and the license number issued to the reviewing physician by each
state;
(D) For a verbal notice, the name and license number of
the reviewing physician; and
(E) For a written notice, a telephone number that the
requesting healthcare provider may call to obtain the name and license number
of the reviewing physician;
(2) The written clinical criteria, if any, and any internal
04-02-2025 11:44:39 ANS111

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 HB1700
rule, guideline, or protocol on which the utilization review entity relied
when making the adverse determination and how those provisions apply to the
subscriber's specific medical circumstance;
(3) Information for the subscriber and the subscriber's
healthcare provider that describes the procedure through which the subscriber
or healthcare provider may request a copy of any report developed by
personnel performing the review that led to the adverse determination; and
(4)(A) Information that explains to the subscriber and the
subscriber's healthcare provider the right to appeal the adverse
determination.
(B) The information required under subdivision (b)(4)(A)
of this section shall include:
(i) Instructions concerning how to perfect an appeal
and how the subscriber and the subscriber's healthcare provider may ensure
that written materials supporting the appeal will be considered in the appeal
process; and
(ii)(a) Addresses and telephone numbers to be used
by healthcare providers and subscribers to make complaints to the Arkansas
State Medical Board, the State Board of Health, and the State Insurance
Department.
(b) Subdivision (b)(4)(B)(ii)(a) of this
section does not apply to self-insured plans for employees of governmental
entities.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1115, concerning the notice
requirements and process for appealing adverse determinations under the Prior
Authorization Transparency Act, is amended to add additional subsections to
read as follows:
(e)(1) Upon an adverse determination by a utilization review entity,
the utilization review entity shall provide a written notice to the
subscriber, which shall include without limitation:
(A)(i) An explanation in clear and ordinary terms of the
basis for the adverse determination.
(ii) An explanation under subdivision (e)(1)(A)(i)
of this section shall include without limitation:
(a) A listing of clinical criteria, if
04-02-2025 11:44:39 ANS111

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 HB1700
applicable, and any internal rule, guideline, or protocol upon which a
utilization review entity relied when making an adverse determination; and
(b) The reason why the provisions listed in
subdivision (e)(1)(A)(ii)(a) of this section apply to the subscriber's
specific medical circumstance;
(B) A description of the procedure through which the
subscriber may request a copy of a report developed by personnel performing
the utilization review that led to the adverse determination;
(C) Information that explains to the subscriber the right
to appeal the adverse determination, including instructions concerning how to
perfect an appeal and how the subscriber may ensure that written materials
supporting the appeal will be considered in the appeals process; and
(D) An address and telephone number to be used by a
subscriber to make a complaint to the Arkansas State Medical Board, the State
Board of Health, and the State Insurance Department.
(2) A utilization review entity shall treat a subscriber’s
request for any information related to a prior authorization, including a
general inquiry, as a request under subdivision (e)(1) of this section.

/s/Achor
















04-02-2025 11:44:39 ANS111